Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.265

Fire protection—Powers and duties of chief of the Washington state patrol.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5655-S.SL) ***

The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, shall have the power and it shall be his or her duty:

(1) In consultation with the secretary and with the advice and assistance of persons representative of the various type agencies to be licensed, to adopt recognized minimum standard requirements pertaining to each category of agency established pursuant to this chapter necessary to protect all persons residing therein from fire hazards;

(2) To adopt licensing minimum standard requirements to allow children who attend classes in a school building during school hours to remain in the same building to participate in before-school or after-school programs and to allow participation in such before-school and after-school programs by children who attend other schools and are transported to attend such before-school and after-school programs;

(3) To make or cause to be made such inspections and investigations of agencies as he or she deems necessary;

(4) To make a periodic review of requirements under RCW 43.216.250(8) and to adopt necessary changes after consultation as required in subsection (1) of this section;

(5) To issue to applicants for licenses under this chapter who comply with the requirements, a certificate of compliance, a copy of which shall be presented to the department before a license shall be issued, except that an initial license may be issued as provided in RCW 43.216.315.

[2018 c 58 s 42; 2013 c 227 s 1; 2006 c 265 s 302. Formerly RCW 43.215.210.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.655.080.